Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2320
Operator; duty to furnish information; center operational, when; certification.

Every operator shall furnish the vendor selected by the board of directors with information concerning the location of its underground facilities. Every operator having underground facilities in existence in this state on February 16, 1994, shall furnish such information to the vendor by April 3, 1995. The vendor shall have the center operational on October 2, 1995. The center shall be certified by the State Fire Marshal, and the certification shall be reviewed every two years to ensure continued compliance with federal law.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 20.